California statutes. Vehicle Code
(n) (1) The impounding agency, if requested to do so not later than 10 days after the date the vehicle was impounded, shall provide the opportunity for a poststorage hearing to determine the validity of the storage to the persons who were the registered and legal owners of the vehicle at the time of impoundment, except that the hearing shall be requested within three days after the date the vehicle was impounded if personal service was provided to a registered owner pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) and no mailed notice is required.

(2) The poststorage hearing shall be conducted not later than two days after the date it was requested. The impounding agency may authorize its own officer or employee to conduct the hearing if the hearing officer is not the same person who directed the storage of the vehicle. Failure of either the registered or legal owner to request a hearing as provided in paragraph (1) or to attend a scheduled hearing shall satisfy the poststorage hearing requirement.

(3) The agency employing the person who directed the storage is responsible for the costs incurred for towing and storage if it is determined that the driver at the time of impoundment had a valid driver’s license.

(o) As used in this section, “days” means workdays not including weekends and holidays.

(p) Charges for towing and storage for any vehicle impounded pursuant to this section shall not exceed the normal towing and storage rates for other vehicle towing and storage conducted by the impounding agency in the normal course of business.

(q) The Judicial Council and the Department of Justice may prescribe standard forms and procedures for implementation of this section to be used by all jurisdictions throughout the state.

(r) The impounding agency may act as the agent of the state in carrying out this section.

(s) No vehicle shall be impounded pursuant to this section if the driver has a valid license but the license is for a class of vehicle other than the vehicle operated by the driver.

(t) This section does not apply to vehicles subject to Sections 14608 and 14609, if there has been compliance with the procedures in those sections.

(u) As used in this section, “district attorney” includes a city attorney charged with the duty of prosecuting misdemeanor offenses.

(v) The agent of a legal owner acting pursuant to subdivision (g) shall be licensed, or exempt from licensure, pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 7500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 75, Sec. 151.   Effective July 19, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 156 of Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

14607.8.

Upon a first misdemeanor conviction of a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 12500 or Section 14601, 14601.1, 14601.2, 14601.3, 14601.4, or 14601.5, the court shall inform the defendant that, pursuant to Section 14607.6, a motor vehicle is subject to forfeiture as a nuisance if it is driven on a highway in this state by a driver with a suspended or revoked license, or by an unlicensed driver, who is a registered owner of the vehicle and has a previous misdemeanor conviction for a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 12500 or Section 14601, 14601.1, 14601.2, 14601.3, 14601.4, or 14601.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1133, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

14608.

(a) A person shall not rent a motor vehicle to another person unless both of the following requirements have been met:

(1) The person to whom the vehicle is rented is licensed under this code or is a nonresident who is licensed under the laws of the state or country of his or her residence.

(2) The person renting to another person has inspected the driver’s license of the person to whom the vehicle is to be rented and compared either the signature thereon with that of the person to whom the vehicle is to be rented or the photograph thereon with the person to whom the vehicle is to be rented.

(b) This section does not prohibit a blind or disabled person who is a nondriver from renting a motor vehicle if both of the following conditions exist at the time of rental:

(1) The blind or disabled person either holds an identification card issued pursuant to this code or is not a resident of this state.

(2) The blind or disabled person has a driver present who is either licensed to drive a vehicle pursuant to this code or is a nonresident licensed to drive a vehicle pursuant to the laws of the state or country of the driver’s residence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 862, Sec. 4.   (AB 2189)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14609.

(a) Every person renting a motor vehicle to another person shall keep a record of the registration number of the motor vehicle rented, the name and address of the person to whom the vehicle is rented, his or her driver’s license number, the jurisdiction that issued the driver’s license, and the expiration date of the driver’s license.

(b) If the person renting the vehicle is a nondriver pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14608, the record maintained pursuant to this section shall include the name and address of the person renting the vehicle and, if applicable, his or her identification card number, the jurisdiction that issued the identification card, and the expiration date of the identification card. The record shall also include the name and address of the licensed driver, his or her driver’s license number, and the expiration date of his or her driver’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1292, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

14610.

(a) It is unlawful for any person:

(1) To display or cause or permit to be displayed or have in his possession any canceled, revoked, suspended, fictitious, fraudulently altered, or fraudulently obtained driver’s license.

(2) To lend his driver’s license to any other person or knowingly permit the use thereof by another.

(3) To display or represent any driver’s license not issued to him as being his license.

(4) To fail or refuse to surrender to the department upon its lawful demand any driver’s license which has been suspended, revoked or canceled.

(5) To permit any unlawful use of a driver’s license issued to him.

(6) To do any act forbidden or fail to perform any act required by this division.

(7) To photograph, photostat, duplicate, or in any way reproduce any driver’s license or facsimile thereof in such a manner that it could be mistaken for a valid license, or to display or have in his possession any such photograph, photostat, duplicate, reproduction, or facsimile unless authorized by the provisions of this code.

(8) To alter any driver’s license in any manner not authorized by this code. 

(b) For purposes of this section, “driver’s license” includes a temporary permit to operate a motor vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 44, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

14610.1.

(a) A person shall not manufacture or sell an identification document of a size and form substantially similar to, or that purports to confer the same privileges as, the drivers’ licenses issued by the department.

(b) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable as follows:

(1) The court shall impose a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), and 24 hours of community service, to be served when the person is not employed or is not attending school. No part of the fine or community service shall be suspended or waived.

(2) In lieu of the penalties imposed under paragraph (1), the court, in its discretion, may impose a jail term of up to one year and a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000). In exercising its discretion the court shall consider the extent of the defendant’s commercial motivation for the offense.

(c) Prosecution under this section shall not preclude prosecution under any other applicable provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 684, Sec. 2.   (AB 2471)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

14610.5.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to do any of the following:

(1) Sell, offer for sale, distribute, or use any crib sheet or cribbing device that contains the answers to any examination administered by the department for any class of driver’s license, permit, or certificate.

(2) Impersonate or allow the impersonation of an applicant for any class of driver’s license, permit, or certificate for the purpose of fraudulently qualifying the applicant for any class of driver’s license, permit, or certificate.

(b) A first conviction under this section is punishable as either an infraction or a misdemeanor ; a second or subsequent conviction is punishable as a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 243, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14610.7.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to knowingly assist in obtaining a driver’s license or identification card for any person whose presence in the United States is not authorized under federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 820, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

14611.

(a) A person shall not knowingly direct the operation of a vehicle transporting a highway route controlled quantity of Class 7 radioactive materials, as defined in Section 173.403 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, by a person who does not possess a training certificate pursuant to Section 12524 and a valid driver’s license of the appropriate class.

(b) A person convicted under this section shall be punished by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 397, Sec. 5.   (SB 810)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. License Fees [14900. - 14911.]



  ARTICLE 1. Imposition of Fees [14900. - 14907.]

14900.

(a) Upon application for an original class C or M driver’s license, a fee of twenty-four dollars ($24), and on and after January 1, 2010, a fee of thirty dollars ($30), shall be paid to the department for a license that will expire on the fifth birthday of the applicant following the date of the application. The payment of the fee entitles the person paying the fee to apply for a driver’s license and to take three examinations within a period of 12 months from the date of the application or during the period that an instruction permit is valid, as provided in Section 12509.

(b) In addition to the application fee specified in subdivision (a), a person who fails to successfully complete the driving skill test on the first attempt shall be required to pay an additional fee of five dollars ($5) for each additional driving skill test administered under that application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 10.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14900.1.

(a) Except as provided in Section 15255.1, upon application for the renewal of a driver’s license or for a license to operate a different class of vehicle, a fee of twenty-four dollars ($24), and on and after January 1, 2010, a fee of thirty dollars ($30), shall be paid to the department for a license that will expire on the fifth birthday of the applicant following the date of the application. The payment of the fee entitles the person paying the fee to apply for a driver’s license and to take three examinations within a period of 12 months from the date of the application or during the period that an instruction permit is valid, as provided in Section 12509.

(b) In addition to the application fee specified in subdivision (a), a person who fails to successfully complete the driving skill test on the first attempt shall be required to pay an additional fee of five dollars ($5) for each additional driving skill test administered under that application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 397, Sec. 6.   (SB 810)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14900.5.

Upon application and payment of the fees for a driver’s license pursuant to Section 14900, an identification card may be issued to the applicant if it is determined that a driver’s license cannot be issued due to the applicant’s physical or mental condition. The identification card, unless canceled earlier, shall expire on the applicant’s sixth birthday following the date of application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 607, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14901.

Upon an application for a duplicate driver’s license or for a change of name on a driver’s license, a fee of nineteen dollars ($19), and on and after January 1, 2010, a fee of twenty-four dollars ($24), shall be paid to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 12.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14902.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (b), (c), (d), (g), and (h) of this section, subdivision (c) of Section 13002, and subdivision (c) of Section 14900, upon an application for an identification card a fee of twenty-six dollars ($26) shall be paid to the department.

(b) An original or replacement senior citizen identification card issued pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 13000 shall be issued free of charge.

(c) The fee for an original or replacement identification card issued to a person who has been determined to have a current income level that meets the eligibility requirements for assistance programs under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) or Chapter 3 (commencing with
 Section 12000) of Part 3 of, or Part 5 (commencing with Section 17000) of, or Article 9 (commencing with Section 18900) of Chapter 10 of Part 6 of, or Chapter 10.1 (commencing with Section 18930) or Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 18937) of Part 6 of, Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be six dollars ($6). The determination of eligibility under this subdivision shall be made by a governmental or nonprofit entity, which shall be subject to regulations adopted by the department.

(d) A fee shall not be charged for an original or replacement identification card issued to any person who can verify their status as a homeless person or homeless child or youth. A homeless services provider that has knowledge of the person’s housing status may verify the person’s status for purposes of this subdivision. A determination of eligibility pursuant to this subdivision shall be subject to regulations adopted by the department. A person
 applying for an identification card under this subdivision shall not be charged a fee for verification of their eligibility.

(e) All fees received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Motor Vehicle Account.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) A “homeless child or youth” has the same meaning as the definition of “homeless children and youths” as set forth in the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11301 et seq.).

(2) A “homeless person” has the same meaning as the definition set forth in the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11301 et seq.).

(3) A “homeless services provider”
 includes:

(A) A governmental or nonprofit agency receiving federal, state, or county or municipal funding to provide services to a “homeless person” or “homeless child or youth,” or that is otherwise sanctioned to provide those services by a local homeless continuum of care organization.

(B) An attorney licensed to practice law in this state.

(C) A local educational agency liaison for homeless children and youth designated as such pursuant to Section 11432 (g)(1)(J)(ii) of Title 42 of the United States Code, or a school social worker.

(D) A human services provider or public social services provider funded by the State of California to provide homeless children or youth services, health services, mental or behavioral health services, substance use
 disorder services, or public assistance or employment services.

(E) A law enforcement officer designated as a liaison to the homeless population by a local police department or sheriff’s department within the state.

(F) Any other homeless services provider that is qualified to verify an individual’s housing status, as determined by the department.

(g) The fee for a replacement identification card issued to an eligible inmate upon release from a federal correctional facility or a county jail facility is eight dollars ($8). For purposes of this subdivision, “eligible inmate” means an inmate who meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The inmate previously held a California driver’s license or identification card.

(2) The inmate has a usable photo on file with the department that is not more than 10 years old.

(3) The inmate has no outstanding fees due for a prior California identification card.

(4) The inmate has provided, and the department has verified, their true full name, date of birth, social security number, and legal presence in the United States, or, upon implementation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 12801.9, if the inmate is unable to submit satisfactory proof that their presence in the United States is authorized under federal law, the inmate has provided proof of their identity pursuant to Section 12801.9.

(5) The inmate currently resides in a federal correctional facility or a county jail facility.

(6) The inmate has provided the department, upon application, a verification of their eligibility under this subdivision that meets all of the following requirements:

(A) Be on federal correctional facility letterhead or county sheriff letterhead.

(B) Be typed or computer generated.

(C) Contain the inmate’s name.

(D) Contain the inmate’s date of birth.

(E) Contain the original signature of an official from the federal correctional facility or county sheriff’s office.

(F) Be dated within 90 days of the date of application.

(h) The fee for an original or replacement identification card issued to an eligible inmate upon release from a state correctional facility is eight dollars ($8). For purposes of this subdivision, “eligible inmate” has the same meaning as that term is defined under subdivision (b) of Section 3007.05 of the Penal Code, and meets both of the following requirements:

(1) The inmate currently resides in a facility housing inmates under the control of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(2) The inmate has provided the department, upon application, a verification of their eligibility under this subdivision that meets the requirements described under subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, and (F) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (g) and contains the signature of an official from the state facility.

(i) (1) The fee for an original or replacement identification card issued to an eligible patient treated in a facility of the State Department of State Hospitals is eight dollars ($8). For purposes of this subdivision, “eligible patient” means a patient who is currently housed in a facility described in Section 4100 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, is preparing to be discharged unconditionally or through a conditional release program, and who meets either of the following sets of requirements:

(A) The patient has previously held a California driver’s license or identification card and all of the following requirements are met:

(i) The patient has a usable photo on file with the department that is not more than 10 years old or has a new usable photo taken.

(ii) The patient has provided, and the department has verified, their true full name, date of birth, social security number, California residence, and legal presence in the United States, or, upon implementation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 12801.9, if the patient is unable to submit satisfactory proof that their presence in the United States is authorized under federal law, the patient has provided proof of their identity pursuant to Section 12801.9.

(iii) The patient has provided the department, upon application, a verification of their eligibility under this subdivision that meets all of the following requirements:

(I) Be on State Department of State Hospitals letterhead.

(II) Be typed or computer generated.

(III) Contain the patient’s name.

(IV) Contain the patient’s date of birth.

(V) Contain the original signature of an official from the State Department of State Hospitals.

(VI) Be dated within 90 days of the date of application.

(B) The patient has not previously held a California driver’s license or identification card and all of the following requirements are met:

(i) The patient has verified and signed under penalty of perjury a completed application for an identification card.

(ii) The patient has a usable photo taken.

(iii) The patient provides a legible print of the thumb or finger.

(iv) The patient has provided acceptable proof of the information described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A), subject to verification by the department.

(v) The patient has provided verification of eligibility as described in clause (iii) of subparagraph (A).

(2) The State Department of State Hospitals shall reimburse the Department of Motor Vehicles for any actual costs incurred in providing assistance pursuant to this paragraph.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 34.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14903.

(a) A fee shall not be charged for an in person original, renewal, or replacement driver’s license or identification card issued to any person who was exonerated, and was released from
 the state prison within the previous six months.

(b) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide a form to any person who was exonerated and released from the state prison within the previous six months. The form, along with a copy of a court order, if provided by the court, shall be taken by the individual to the Department of Motor Vehicles to qualify for the fee exemption in subdivision (a).

(c) For the purposes of this section, “exonerated” shall have the same meaning as in Section 3007.05 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 403, Sec. 3.   (AB 672)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14904.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, before a driver’s license may be issued, reissued, or returned to the licensee after a suspension or a revocation of a person’s driving privilege ordered by the department has been terminated, there shall, in addition to any other fees required by this code, be paid to the department a fee sufficient to pay the actual costs of the issuance, reissuance, or return as determined by the department. 

(b) This section shall not apply to any suspension or revocation that is set aside by the department or a court. 

(c) This section shall not apply to any suspension or revocation based upon a physical or mental condition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1177, Sec. 2.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

14905.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, in lieu of the fees in Section 14904, before a driver’s license may be issued, reissued, or returned to a person after suspension or revocation of the person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle pursuant to Section 13353 or 13353.2, there shall be paid to the department a fee in an amount of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) to pay the costs of the administration of the administrative suspension and revocation programs for persons who refuse or fail to complete chemical testing, as provided in Section 13353, or who drive with an excessive amount of alcohol in their blood, as provided in Section 13353.2, any costs of the Department of the California Highway Patrol related to the payment of compensation for overtime for attending any administrative hearings pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 14100) of Chapter 3 and Section 13382, and any reimbursement for costs mandated by the state pursuant to subdivisions (f) and (g) of Section 23612.

(b) This section does not apply to a suspension or revocation that is set aside by the department or a court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 805, Sec. 20.   Effective September 23, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14906.

(a) In addition to the fees required by Section 14904, the department may require payment of a fee sufficient to pay the actual costs, as determined by the department, for giving any notices in connection with suspensions or revocations in accordance with Sections 22, 29, and 13106.

(b) This section does not apply to any suspension or revocation that is set aside by the department or a court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1221, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

14907.

In addition to the fees required pursuant to Section 14904, there shall be paid to the department a fee of one hundred twenty dollars ($120) to pay the costs of a departmental review when requested pursuant to Section 14105.5, following a hearing conducted pursuant to Section 13353 or 13353.2. The fee authorized under this section shall be collected in conjunction with any request for a departmental review received on or after January 1, 2003.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 805, Sec. 21.   Effective September 23, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Collection of Fees [14910. - 14911.]

14910.

(a) The department shall, with the consent of the applicant, collect the amounts that it has been notified are due pursuant to former Section 40509 and former Section 40509.5, and any service fees added to those amounts, at the time it collects from the applicant any fees and penalties required to issue or renew a driver’s license or identification card.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the department shall remit all amounts collected pursuant to
 subdivision (a), after deducting the administrative fee authorized in subdivision (c), to each jurisdiction in the amounts due to each jurisdiction according to its notices filed with the department. Within 45 days from the time payment is received by the department, the department shall inform each jurisdiction which of its notices of failure to appear or failure to pay have been discharged.

(c) The department shall assess a fee for posting the bail on each notice of failure to appear or failure to pay that is given to the department pursuant to former Section 40509 or former Section 40509.5, in an amount, as determined by the department, that is
 sufficient to provide a sum equal to its actual costs of administering this section, not to exceed one dollar ($1) per notice. The fees shall be assessed to each jurisdiction on a regular basis by deducting the amount due to the department pursuant to this subdivision from the bails and fines collected pursuant to subdivision (a), prior to remitting the balance to each jurisdiction pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (e) of Section 13364, if bail is collected under this section for the violation of any provisions of this code, the person shall be deemed to be convicted of those sections violated.

(e) Any amounts collected by the department under this section are nonrefundable by the department.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 42003, payment of bail to the department in accordance with this section shall be paid in full and not in installments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 800, Sec. 18.   (AB 2746)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14911.

(a) When a notice of failure to appear or failure to pay a fine is recorded on the department records pursuant to former Section 40509 and former Section 40509.5, the fine and any penalty assessments shall be a lien upon all vehicles of the defendant of a type subject to registration under this code.

(b) For every lien arising pursuant to subdivision (a) that is due and not paid, the department may collect the amount of the lien plus costs, and Article
 6 (commencing with Section 9800) of Chapter 6 of Division 3.5 shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 800, Sec. 19.   (AB 2746)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Driver License Compact [15000. - 15028.]



  ARTICLE 1. Generally [15000. - 15003.]

15000.

The Driver License Compact is hereby enacted into law and entered into with all other jurisdictions legally joining therein in the form substantially contained in Article 2 (commencing with Section 15020), of Chapter 6, Division 6 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 237.)
-------------------------------------------

15001.

As used in the compact, the term “licensing authority” with reference to this State shall mean the Department of Motor Vehicles. That department shall furnish to the appropriate authorities of any other party state any information or documents reasonably necessary to facilitate the administration of Sections 15022, 15023, and 15024 of the compact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 237.)
-------------------------------------------

15002.

The compact administrator provided for in Section 15026 of this compact shall not be entitled to any additional compensation on account of his service as such administrator, but shall be entitled to expenses incurred in connection with his duties and responsibilities as such administrator, in the same manner as for expenses incurred in connection with any other duties or responsibilities of his office or employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 618.)
-------------------------------------------

15003.

As used in the compact, with reference to this State, the term “executive head” shall mean the Governor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 237.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Compact Terms [15020. - 15028.]

15020.

(a) The party states find that:

(1) The safety of their streets and highways is materially affected by the degree of compliance with state laws and local ordinances relating to the operation of motor vehicles.

(2) Violation of such a law or ordinance is evidence that the violator engages in conduct which is likely to endanger the safety of persons and property.

(3) The continuance in force of a license to drive is predicated upon compliance with laws and ordinances relating to the operation of motor vehicles, in whichever jurisdiction the vehicle is operated.

(b) It is the policy of the party states to:

(1) Promote compliance with the laws, ordinances and administrative rules and regulations relating to the operation of motor vehicles by their drivers in each of the jurisdictions where such drivers operate motor vehicles.

(2) Make the reciprocal recognition of licenses to drive and eligibility therefor more just and equitable by considering the overall compliance with motor vehicle laws, ordinances and administrative rules and regulations as a condition precedent to the continuance or issuance of any license by reason of which the licensee is authorized or permitted to operate a motor vehicle in any of the party states.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 237.)
-------------------------------------------

15021.

As used in the compact:

(a) “State” means a state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

(b) “Home state” means the state which has issued and has the power to suspend or revoke the use of the license or permit to operate a motor vehicle.

(c) “Conviction” means a conviction of any offense related to the use or operation of a motor vehicle which is prohibited by state law, municipal ordinance or administrative rule or regulation, or a forfeiture of bail, bond or other security deposited to secure appearance by a person charged with having committed any such offense, and which conviction or forfeiture is required to be reported to the licensing authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 237.)
-------------------------------------------

15022.

The licensing authority of a party state shall report each conviction of a person from another party state occurring within its jurisdiction to the licensing authority of the home state of the licensee. Such report shall clearly identify the person convicted; describe the violation specifying the section of the statute, code, or ordinance violated; identify the court in which action was taken; indicate whether a plea of guilty or not guilty was entered, or the conviction was a result of the forfeiture of bail, bond or other security; and shall include any special findings made in connection therewith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 237.)
-------------------------------------------

15023.

(a) The licensing authority in the home state, for the purposes of suspending, revoking, or limiting the license to operate a motor vehicle, shall give the same effect to the conduct reported, pursuant to Section 15022 of this compact, as it would if such conduct had occurred in the home state, in the case of a conviction for:

(1) Manslaughter or negligent homicide resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle;

(2) Driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a narcotic drug, or under the influence of any other drug to a degree which renders the driver incapable of safely driving a motor vehicle;

(3) Any felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used;

(4) Failure to stop and render aid in the event of a motor vehicle accident resulting in the death or personal injury of another.

(b) As to any other conviction, reported pursuant to Section 15022, the licensing authority in the home state shall give such effect to the conduct as is provided by the laws of the home state.

(c) If the laws of a party state do not provide for offenses or violations denominated or described in precisely the words employed in subdivision (a) of this section, such party state shall construe the denominations and descriptions appearing in subdivision (a) hereof as being applicable to and identifying those offenses or violations of a substantially similar nature, and the laws of such party state shall contain such provisions as may be necessary to ensure that full force and effect is given to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 237.)
-------------------------------------------

15024.

Upon application for a license to drive, the licensing authority in a party state shall ascertain whether the applicant has ever held, or is the holder of a license to drive issued by any other party state. The licensing authority in the state where application is made shall not issue a license to drive to the applicant if:

(1) The applicant has held such a license, but the license has been suspended by reason, in whole or in part, of a violation, and if such suspension period has not terminated.

(2) The applicant has held such a license, but the license has been revoked by reason, in whole or in part, of a violation, and if such revocation has not terminated; except that after the expiration of one year from the date the license was revoked, such person may make application for a new license if permitted by law. The licensing authority may refuse to issue a license to any such applicant if, after investigation, the licensing authority determines that it will not be safe to grant to such person the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public highways.

(3) The applicant is the holder of a license to drive issued by another party state and currently in force, unless the applicant surrenders such license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 237.)
-------------------------------------------

15025.

Except as expressly required by provisions of this compact, nothing contained herein shall be construed to affect the right of any party state to apply any of its other laws relating to licenses to drive to any person or circumstance, nor to invalidate or prevent any driver license agreement or other co-operative arrangement between a party state and a nonparty state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963 Ch. 237.)
-------------------------------------------

15026.

(a) The head of the licensing authority of each party state shall be the administrator of this compact for his state. The administrators of all party states, acting jointly, shall have the power to formulate all necessary and proper procedures for the exchange of information under this compact.

(b) The administrator of each party state shall furnish to the administrator of each other party state any information or documents reasonably necessary to facilitate the administration of this compact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 237.)
-------------------------------------------

15027.

(a) This compact shall become effective as to any state in which this compact becomes effective as the law of that state.

(b) Any party state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing this compact as the law of that state, but no such withdrawal shall take effect until six months after the executive head of the withdrawing state has given notice of the withdrawal to the executive heads of all other party states. No withdrawal shall affect the validity or applicability by the licensing authorities of states remaining party to the compact of any report of conviction occurring prior to the withdrawal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 237.)
-------------------------------------------

15028.

The compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of the compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provisions of the compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any party state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of the compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If the compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any state party thereto, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining states and in full force and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 237.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Program [15200. - 15326.]



  ARTICLE 1. Intent [15200. - 15200.]

15200.

It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this chapter, to adopt those standards required of drivers by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration of the United States Department of Transportation, as set forth in the federal Motor Carrier Safety Improvement Act of 1999 (Public Law 106-159) and to reduce or prevent commercial motor vehicle accidents, fatalities, and injuries by permitting drivers to hold only one license, disqualifying drivers for certain criminal offenses and serious traffic violations, and strengthening licensing and testing standards. This act is a remedial law and shall be liberally construed to promote the public health, safety and welfare. To the extent that this chapter conflicts with general driver licensing provisions, this chapter